North Dakota, session 69, SB2120.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. TRANSFER - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND TO
HIGHWAY PATROL TROOPERS' RETIREMENT SYSTEM FUND. The office of management and
budget shall transfer the sum of $15,000,000 from the strategic investment and improvements fund to
the highway patrol troopers' retirement system fund, for the purpose of increasing the funded liability of
the highway patrol troopers' retirement plan during the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending
June 30, 2027.

S. B. NO. 2120 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2120.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 83 Nays 6 Absent 5
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State